Utah statutes.
30-1-2.1.   Validation of marriage to a person subject to chronic epileptic fits who had not been sterilized.

All marriages, otherwise valid and legal, contracted prior to the effective date of this act, to which either party was subject to chronic epileptic fits  and who had not been sterilized, as provided by law, are hereby validated and legalized in all respects as though such marriages had been duly and legally contracted in the first instance.



Enacted by Chapter 41, 1963 General Session

